New Jersey, session 222, S2550.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Gross income shall not include net gains or income from the sale or exchange of employer securities of a qualified business with fewer than 500 employees that is not publically traded on any stock exchange to an employee stock ownership plan, a New Jersey S corporation owned by an employee stock ownership plan, or an eligible worker-owned cooperative, benefiting employees of the qualified business in this State if upon completion of the transaction the employee stock ownership plan, New Jersey S corporation owned by an employee stock ownership plan, or eligible worker-owned cooperative plan owns at least 30 percent of all outstanding employer securities issued by the qualified business. b.    As used in this section: Eligible worker-owned cooperative means an eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined by paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of section 1042 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.1042). Employee stock ownership plan means an employee stock ownership plan as defined by paragraph (7) of subsection (e) of section 4975 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.4975). Employer securities means employer securities as defined by subsection (l) of section 409 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.409). Qualified business means a private entity, whose headquarters or base of operations is in this State, including but not limited to a corporation, an S corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership, a sole proprietorship, and all private entities related by common ownership or control. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.